District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1953

Credit for cumulative leave on transfer or promotion.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 29, 1951, 65 Stat. 660, ch. 601, § 4
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 21, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1021.
1973 Ed., § 31-691a.